District of Columbia statutes.
38-1251.01

University of the District of Columbia Debt Collection Fund.

(a)

There is established as a special fund the University of the District of Columbia Debt Collection Fund (“Fund”), which shall be administered by the University of the District of Columbia in accordance with subsection (c) of this section.

(b)

The fund shall consist of the revenue from the collection of unpaid student tuition, student fees, and student loans by the Central Collection Unit in accordance with subchapter XVII of Chapter 3 of Title 1 [§ 1-350.01 et seq.].

(c)

The Fund shall be used for expenses associated with the operations of the University of the District of Columbia.

(d)

(1)

The money deposited into the Fund, and interest earned, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time.

(2)

Subject to authorization by Congress, any funds appropriated in the Fund shall be continually available without regard to fiscal year limitation.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7033, 60 DCR 12472
Collection on behalf of the University of the District of Columbia, § 1-350.02a.
This section is referenced in § 1-350.02a.
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 7033 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 7031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Delinquent Debt Recovery Amendment Act of 2013”.
Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.